Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-327
Fund; advisory board.

The commission shall oversee and the administrator, if a third-party administrator is selected, shall administer the fund with the advice of an advisory board appointed by the commission.

The number of members on such advisory board shall be not less than seven nor more than nine members. The composition of the membership of the advisory board shall be determined by the commission and shall include the following representatives: One member shall represent the commission; one member shall represent elementary and secondary schools; one member shall represent libraries; one member shall represent rural health care providers; two members, but not more than three members, shall represent telecommunications companies; and one member, but not more than two members, shall represent the public.

The advisory board shall provide recommendations to the commission at the public hearing held pursuant to the Open Meetings Act. The advisory board shall also, on an annual basis, recommend the services to be supported by the fund.

Laws 1997, LB 686, § 8;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-1408;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 205;

Laws 2004, LB 821, § 44.

Open Meetings Act, see section 84-1407.